Nevada, session 83, SB206.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 218F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. During each legislative interim and at the direction of the
Interim Finance Committee, the Fiscal Analysis Division shall
complete a study that:
(a) Estimates the potential return on investment of not more
than two proposals for the creation of or revision to state
programs during the next legislative session; and
(b) Determines and analyzes the annual return on investment
of not more than three existing state programs.
2. The Fiscal Analysis Division may, to the extent money is
available for such purpose, contract with any person who has the
necessary expertise to assist the Fiscal Analysis Division in
completing the study required pursuant to subsection 1.
3. A report of the study completed pursuant to subsection 1
must be submitted to the Interim Finance Committee by
December 1 of each even-numbered year.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB206*